src-fst-morphology-phonology.twolc.md
# Inari Saami morphophonological rule file

This file documents the [phonology.twolc file](http://github.com/giellalt/lang-smn/blob/main/src/fst/phonology.twolc) 

Here we govern all morphophonological processes.

# Alphabet 

## The Inari Saami letters

* a á â ä b c d e f g h i j k l m n o õ p q
 r s t u v w x y z æ ä ø ö å
 č đ ŋ ŧ š ž

* A Á Â Å B C D E F G H I J K L M N O Õ P Q
 R S T U V W X Y Z Æ Ä Ø Ö Å
 Č Đ Ŋ Ŧ Š Ž
* **%-** hyphen
* **'** the hyphen as hyphen
* **⎈** the ghost sign used in compounding, does not work in hfst

### Accented letters, just in case

* É Ó Ú Í À È Ò Ù Ì Ë Ü Ï Ê Ô Û Î Ã Ý þ Ð
 é ó ú í à è ò ù ì ë ü ï ê ô û î ã ý þ ð
 ß ª ß ç

Literal quotes and angles must be escaped (cf morpheme boundaries further down):
* »
«
>
<

### Archiphonemes

* **a5:a á5:á e5:e i5:i u5:u y5:y o5:o ä5:ä**  these do not change 
* **i2:i u2:u â2:â**  this is final i, u in contract verbs etc changing to e, o
* **i3:i**  this is invariant i
* **i4:i**  this is the underlying i consonant
* **i6:0** a fake vowel, to get WG rules to function, e.g. kyehtlov (kyehti6lov)
* **c5:c č5:č d5:d h5:h j5:j l5:l m5:m ŋ5:ŋ r5:r t5:t z5:z**  these do not change
* **b6:b d6:d g6:g** clitic consonants, jiemge, epke
* **j6:0** a fake consonant, to get WG rules to function, e.g. puávui
* **p4:p k4:k l4:l t4:t č4:č c4:c**  these are consonants that change in cg
* **':'** is the real apostroph

Then some more abstract archiphonemes
These are dependent upon the **Triggers** in the next section
* **%^RC:0** = root cons., lengthened by ^CLEN - máán%RCu máánnun
* **%^RV:0** = root vowel, lengthened by ^RLEN - ta%^RVvlu taavlu 
* **%^SC:0** = stem cons, %^SC:j, pluss lengthen after earlier shortening by %^CSH, see lyeme
* **%^SV:0** = stem vowel, lengthened by ^SLEN u:uu - táálu%^SV tááloost
* **%^VO:0** = vowel copy

### Triggers
These symbols govern the behaviour of the archiphonemes above.

* **%^CLEN:0** = Cons lengthening, with ^RC
* **%^CSH:0** = Cons shortening, laaŋkku - laaŋkun
* **%^RVSH:0** = Root vowel shortening
* **%^FCD:0** = Final consonant deletion 
* **%^FVD:0** = Final vowel deletion 
* **%^EA:0** = Stem vowel: e and i to a/á in ill, and root vowel ä>á, e(e)>iä, ie>iä, ye>uá
* **%^EX:0** = Stem vowel: i to â where it should have been á, this is Err/Orth only
* **%^RLEN:0** = Root vowel lengthening
* **%^SLEN:0** = Stem vowel lengthening
* **%^SVLOW:0** = Stem vowel lowering â>á and u>o - árppu árppoin, Root vowel shortening when more than one cns in consonant centre and suffix starts with i
* **%^SVSH:0** = Stem vowel shortening kappeer kaperân
* **%^WG:0** = Weak grade trigger
* **%^ÁE:0** = á to e in 3-syll, triggered by ^WG
* **%^ÁI:0** = á to i in 3-syll, triggered by ^WG
* **%^VHIGH:0** = High rootvow for verbs: e>iä, a>o, o>u, ää>áá, ee>iä, note also: ie>iä, ye>uá, uo>uá
* **%^VBACK:0** = Back rootvow for verbs: ä(ä)>a(a), á>aa, uá>o, ye>uo
* **%^BLOCK:0** = This symbol just to block otherwise triggering contexts
* **%^IUML:0** = â to e in front of high suffixes 

Trigger ordering in twolc and lexc, from left to right:

{SV,ÁE,ÁI}  {EA,EX,SC}  {FCD|,VD} {WG,CSH} CLEN  {VHIGH,VBACK}  {RVSH,RLEN} {SLEN,SVSH}  SVLOW

## Morpheme boundaries:

Here we define the suffix border >
The other borders are not used yet, but still defined:

* **«**:  Derivational prefix
* **»**:  Derivational suffix
* **%<**:  Inflectional prefx
* **%>**:  Inflectional suffix
* **%^**:  (exceptional) soft hyphenation point
and the symbol #, which is Word boundary for both lexicalised and dynamic compounds

End of alphabet definitions

Sets

* **Vow = a á â ä e i o u y æ ø ö å** 
**i2 u2 â2** 
**i3** 
**a5 á5 i5 u5 y5 o5 ä5** 
**i6** 
**é ó ú í à è ò ù ì ë ü ï ê ô û î ã ý** 
**A Á Â Ä E I O U Y Æ Ø Ö Å** 
**É Ó Ú Í À È Ò Ú Ì Ë Ü Ï Ê Ô Û Î Ã Ý** 
**%^RV %^SV ;** 
* **RealVow = a á â ä e i o u y æ ø ö å** 
y5 i2 i3 i5 i6 â2
**é ó ú í à è ò ù ì ë ü ï ê ô û î ã ý** 
**A Á Â Ä E I O U Y Æ Ø Ö Å** 
**É Ó Ú Í À È Ò Ú Ì Ë Ü Ï Ê Ô Û Î Ã Ý ;** 
* **Cns = b c č d đ f g h j k l m n ŋ** 
**p q r s š t ŧ v w x z ž** 
**B C Č D Đ F G H J K L M N Ŋ** 
**P Q R S Š T Ŧ V W X Z Ž** 
**g2 k2 m2 n2** 
**b3 d3 g3 m3 h3** 
p4 k4 r4 l4 i4 t4 c4 č4
h5 j5 ŋ5 t5 c5 l5 t5 d5 r5 z5 j6
%^RC %^SC ;
* UnvoicedCns = c č f h k p s š t ;
* **Geminate = b d g p h t k c f z l m n ŋ r s š v ;**  
* **Sgm = Vow Cns ;** 
* **NotSuffixBorder = %^FCD %^FVD %^WG %^CSH %^CLEN %^SLEN %^RLEN %^RVSH %^SVLOW %^ÁE %^EA %^EX %^ÁI %^SVSH %^VHIGH %^VBACK %^IUML Vow Cns ;** 
* **Triggers = %^FCD %^FVD %^WG %^CSH %^CLEN %^SLEN %^RLEN %^RVSH %^SVLOW %^ÁE %^EA %^EX %^ÁI %^SVSH %^VHIGH %^VBACK %^IUML ;** 
* TriggersnotFCVD = %^WG %^CSH %^CLEN %^SLEN %^RLEN %^RVSH %^SVLOW %^ÁE %^EA %^EX %^ÁI %^SVSH %^VHIGH %^VBACK %^IUML ;
* **StemCns = b b3 d d3 g g2 g3 h h2 h3** 
**j l m m2 m3 m8 n n8 n2 ŋ r s ;** 

# Definition section

Introducing a WG right context 
```WeakGrade =  (RealVow:) [:RealVow |i6:]  (Cns:) ([%^SV:|%^ÁI:](%^ÁE:)) (%^FCD:) %^WG:0   ; ```  

As we look at more cases, the WeakGrade definition tends to be longer. 
We want to keep it short, but we want the code to work Thus, we document.
* The second :RealVow is there for long consonant stems
* The (Cns:) is there for consonant stems
* -č: is there for the č:i pair of eeč^RCi:eijijn
* The i6: is there for kyehtlov (kyehti6lov)

# Rule section

First we list the consonant rules, thereafter the vowel ones.

## Consonant rules

### Consonant gradation and shortening rules

First gradation and shortening. They are in the same rules, to avoid rule conflicts.

**RULE: x:y consonant gradation ** =  WG gives x:x and x:y, when there is no consonant lengthening  

**RULE: č:j consonant gradation ** =  WG gives x:x and x:y, when there is no consonant lengthening  
- Not č:j if iä to its left. TODO check vowel sequences with i but not ä and vice versa.

* *ke^RVč^RCi^EA^WG^CLEN>á*
* *kiäijá000>á*

* *sa^RVh^RCâi5^WG^CLEN>i*
* *sa0vv0i00>i*

* *ta^RVh^RCâ^WG^VHIGH#škyett4*
* ???
* *tu^RVp^RCe^WG*
* *tu0v0e0*
* *käähir^WG>*
* *käävir0>*
* *juáh^RCu^WG^RVSH>ttáá*
* *juáv0u00>ttáá*

**RULE: č:j consonant gradation ** =  WG gives x:x and x:y, when there is no consonant lengthening  

**RULE: hh:vv** =  já%^RVhhá%^SVl%^ÁI : jäävvil

**RULE: t:đ, also tk4:đh gradation, part 1 ** =   

* *puáttee#vuot^RCâ^FVD^WG>i5i5*
* *puáttee#vuođ0000>ii*
* *jo^RVtk4â^WG^RLEN>*
* *joođhâ00>*
* *vädis#vuot^RCâ^FVD^WG>i5i5*
* *vädis#vuođ0000>ii*

**RULE: k4:h gradation for kk4, tk4, rkk4, lkk4** =  

* *totk4os^WG*
* *tođhos0*

**RULE: xx:yy gradation for xx4** =   puáhhoin, sukk4á:suhháást

* *mä^RVtk4i^WG^RLEN>.#.*
* *määđhi00>.#.*

* *su^RVkk4á^SV^WG^CLEN^SLEN>st*
* *su0hháá000>st*

**RULE: t4:đ and c4, č4, p4 gradation for tt:đ etc.** 
čuottâlm:čuođâlm njuottâs 

* *ru^RVtt4â^WG^RLEN>*
* *ruu0đâ00>*

**RULE: ht:vt, ks:vs etc. gradation** =  ht:vt, we use h 

* *pihtâs^WG*
* *pivtâs0*

### Consonant shortening rules

**RULE: k:0 gradation and shortening for xkk4** =  for lkk4, rkk4, vkk4

* *la^RVvkk4â^WG^RLEN*
* *laav0hâ00*

**RULE: xyy:xy gradation A** =   há%^RVi4ttás%^ÁI
1) WG
2) CSH  !he%^RVi4ttug
3) 

* *á^RVrppu^WG^RLEN>*
* *áár0pu00>*
* *á^RVrppu^WG^RVSH>ttáá*
* *á0r0pu00>ttáá*
* *riänttus^WG>*
* *riän0tus0>*

**RULE: č:0 in čč4 consonant gradation when CLEN** = when čč4

* *lu^RVčč4â^WG^RLEN^SVLOW>in*
* *luu0já000>in*

**RULE: From i4j to j when WG and CSH** = e.g. sai4joos:sajoos
1) when WG
2) when CSH 
3) ?

**RULE: xx:x consonant gradation and shortening and x:x shortening** =   weak grade **or** consonant shortening (Both in same rule)
1) when WG
2) when CSH  

*Tests:*
* *ku^RVrrâ^CSH^RLEN>n*
* *kuu0râ00>n*
* *so^RVllâ^CSH^RLEN>n*
* *soo0lâ00>n*
* *vi^RVššâ^CSH^RVSH>vettee*
* *vi00šâ00>vettee*
* *la^RVs^RCe^SVtt^RLEN^SLEN>vettee*
* *laas0ee0t00>vettee*
* *cuozzâ^WG^RLEN>*
* *cuo0zâ00>*
* *vá^RVddu^CSH^RLEN>n*
* *váá0du00>n*
* *haavvâr^CSH^SVSH>ist*
* *ha00vâr00>ist*
* *pottáák^SC^CSH^SVSH>ist*
* *po0t0ákk00>ist*
* *kahhaan^CSH^SVSH>ân*
* *ka0h0an00>ân*

**RULE: tt:t  - final consonant and consonant gradation**  = consonant gradation, and 3syll verbs in -tt lose t in front of cns-initial suff
1) WG, not CLEN
2) CSH
3) uáivátt : uáivát
4) olášuttem:olášutmân
5) uáiváátt>ân uáiváátân
6) uápásmittijm>uápásmitijm

* *las^RCe^SVtt^CLEN^SLEN>*
* *lassee0t00>*

**RULE: nnj to nj shortening weak grade and consonant shortening** =  special rule, e.g. konnjâl -> konjâlân puánnjá

**RULE: Word final consonant deletion** = for vaskâm:vaaskâ

* *va^RVskâm^FCD^RLEN*
* *vaaskâ000*
* *njuolgâd^FCD^RVSH*
* *njuolgâ000*

**RULE: Final m in stems, smm to sm** = 
1) puttáás_min 
2) stoorgâs_mân  sto%^RVrgâsm

**RULE: Wordfinal consonants part 1**  e%^RVlâčč
1)
2)jurdâččmân:jurdâšmân ju%^RVrdâčč%^RLEN%>mân
3)  šš>š in hárávušš>vetteđ 

* *hárávušš>vetteđ*
* *hárávu0š>vetteđ*
* *konnjâl^CSH>ân*
* *kon0jâl0>ân*
* *suán^RCju^CLEN>n*
* *suánnju0>n*
* *haamit^SC^CSH^SVSH>ist*
* *ha0mitt00>ist*
* *su^RVkk4á^SV^WG^CLEN^SLEN>st*
* *su0hháá000>st*

### Consonant lengthening rules

**RULE: Lengthening of half-long root consonant x:xx** =  riččá piiru piirrun niisu niissun

**RULE: Quality change of root consonant x:yy** =  consonant lengthening after WG, changing h:v, p:v, c:s

**RULE: Lengthening of root consonant x:yy** =  consonant lengthening after WG - h:vv, p:vv, c:ss

* *va^RVh%^RCo^WG^CLEN>im*
* *va0vvo00>im*

* *sa^RVh^RCâi5^WG^CLEN>i*
* *sa0vv0i00>i*
* *ka^RVss^RCa^SV^WG^CLEN^SLEN>st*
* *ka0ss0aa000>st*
* *va^RVh^RCe^SV^WG^CLEN^SLEN>st*
* *va0vvee000>st*
* *va^RVh^RCe^SV^CLEN^SLEN>n*
* *va0hhee00>n*

**RULE: Lengthening of consonant h5** =    this one does not fit into the general rule because of h5:h

*TEST:*
* *put^RCe^SVst^CLEN^SLEN>*
* *putteest00>*
* *ke^RVp^RCidm^CLEN^RLEN^SLEN>ân*
* *keeppidm000>ân*
* *kieh^RCâ^WG^CLEN^SVLOW>in*
* *kievvá000>in*
* *i^RVšš^RCe^SV^WG^CLEN^SLEN>st*
* *i0šš0ee000>st*
* *kol^RCe^CLEN>*
* *kolle0>*
* *kiel^RCâ^CLEN>n*
* *kiellâ0>n*

**RULE: č:ij part 1** =  
* eeč^RCi:eijijn eeč^RCi^WG^CLEN^SVLOW>in
eeč^RCi:eijijn eeč^RCi^WG^CLEN^SVLOW>in
* *e^RVč^RCi^WG^CLEN>in*
* *e0* `ij` (Eng. i0 0 >jn)
* *ke^RVč^RCi^EA^WG^CLEN>á*
* *kiä* `ij` (Eng. á0 0 0 >á)
* *ke^RVč^RCi^WG^RLEN*
* *kee* `j0` (Eng. i0 0)

* *e^RVč^RCi^WG^CLEN>id*
* *ei* `j0` (Eng. i0 0 >jd)

**RULE: Lengthening root consonant j:ij 1** =  for saje:saijeen 

**RULE: č:ij and j:ij part 2** =  

*Tests:*
* *sa^RVj^RCe^SV^CLEN^SLEN>n*
* *sa0ijee00>n*
* *pááj^RCá^CLEN>n*
* *pááijá0>n*
* *vaj^RCe^SVd^CLEN^SLEN>*
* *vaijeed00>*

**RULE: nj to nnj consonant lengthening** =  special rule, suánju : suánnjun for Par and Ess

**RULE: Consonant lengthening after xx:x and xy:zy weak grade with x4 on upper side** =   k4, č, p4  kukse:kuvssijn  

**RULE: Consonant lengthening xy:xyy**  ( fix: døp Cz om til Cx)

### Stem consonant and suffix consonant rules

**RULE: Assimilation of consonants t d š**  delet t in front of -ttáá, avoid -tttáá

* *haamit>ttáá*
* *haami0>ttáá*

**RULE: Wordfinal consonants part 2**  e%^RVlâčč cummâlâhč:cummâlâhš

**RULE: Final consonant x:xx** =  pottáák potákkân  

**RULE: Clitic devoicing** =  for focus particle bá to pá after unvoiced stem cns.

**RULE: Gerund devoicing** =   dijn to tijn after stems in tšs

## Vowel rules

### First syllable vowel shortening rules

*Tests:*
* *koonnjâl^CSH>ân*
* *ko0n0jâl0>ân*
* *kappeer^CSH^SVSH>ist*
* *ka0p0er00>ist*
* *čäällim^CSH>ist*
* *čä00lim0>ist*
* *muusik^SC^CSH^RVSH>ist*
* *mu0sikk00>ist*
* *aarrân^CSH>ân*
* *a00rân0>ân*
* *kiirrâs^RVSH>ân*
* *ki0rrâs0>ân*

**RULE: Vowel shortening VV:V (e in own rule)** = ráávhu- : rávhoid, käähir%^CSH%>id kuuđiâ%^RVSH%>žân
1. essee : esseid, suklaa : suklaid

**RULE: Long vowel shortening** = (example?), no ^CSH, since that gives Vy:0
3syll kaavpug:kavpugân 
táálhudem koomerdem

**RULE: e:0 in passive and elsewhere** \\
2st stems
kaavpug:kavpugân 
táálhudem koomerdem
1. essee : esseid, suklaa : suklaid                                                                                    
